New York, session 2025-2026, A11633.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 1203-a of the vehicle and traffic 2 law, as amended by chapter 220 of the laws of 1984, is amended to read 3 as follows: 4 3. (a) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, 5 any municipality may issue a temporary special vehicle identification 6 parking permit to any person who is temporarily unable to ambulate with- 7 out the aid of an assisting device, as certified by a physician. Such 8 temporary special vehicle identification parking permit shall be valid 9 for not more than six months and shall be recognized statewide. 10 (b) Any resident of New York state who is seventy-five years of age or 11 older and who was issued a temporary special vehicle identification 12 parking permit pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subdivision shall be 13 eligible to apply for and shall be issued a permit pursuant to subdivi- 14 sion one of this section, as though such person was a severely disabled 15 person, as defined in subdivision four of section four hundred 16 four-a of this chapter, without providing updated medical certification 17 or additional medical documents upon application for renewal or issuance 18 of the permit. 19 § 1-a. Subdivision 3 of section 1203-a of the vehicle and traffic law, 20 as amended by chapter 159 of the laws of 2026, is amended to read as 21 follows: 22 3. (a) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, 23 any municipality may issue a temporary special vehicle identification 24 parking permit to any person who is temporarily unable to ambulate with- 25 out the aid of an assisting device, as certified by any healthcare prac- 26 titioner authorized to certify that an individual is severely disabled 27 pursuant to subdivision four of section four hundred four-a of this 28 chapter. Such temporary special vehicle identification parking permit EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15976-02-6 A. 11633 2 1 shall be valid for not more than six months and shall be recognized 2 statewide. 3 (b) Any resident of New York state who is seventy-five years of age or 4 older and who was issued a temporary special vehicle identification 5 parking permit pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subdivision shall be 6 eligible to apply for and shall be issued a permit pursuant to subdivi- 7 sion one of this section, as though such person was a severely disabled 8 person, as defined in subdivision four of section four hundred four-a of 9 this chapter, without providing updated medical certification or addi- 10 tional medical documents upon application for renewal or issuance of the 11 permit. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to all 13 permits issued or renewed on or after such effective date; provided, 14 however, that the amendments to subdivision 3 of section 1203-a of the 15 vehicle and traffic law made by section one-a of this act shall take 16 effect on the same date and in the same manner as section 5 of chapter 17 159 of the laws of 2026 takes effect.